apertium-rus-ukr.ukr.dix
<pardef n="гост/я__n_f_aa">
<e>       <p><l>я</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ю</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ею</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>е</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ей</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ей</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ям</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ях</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ями</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="громад/а__n_f_nn">
<e>       <p><l>а</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>у</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ою</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>о</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ам</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ах</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ами</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="діало/г__n_m_nn">
<e>       <p><l>г</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>г</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>гу</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>гові</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>гу</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>зі</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>гом</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>гу</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ги</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ги</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>гів</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>гам</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>гах</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>гами</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ги</l><r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="дільниц/я__n_f_nn">
<e>       <p><l>я</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ю</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ею</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>е</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ь</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ям</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ях</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ями</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="енергетик__n_m_aa">
<e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ом</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ах</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ами</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="гостя"><i>гост</i><par n="гост/я__n_f_aa"/></e>
<e lm="громада"><i>громад</i><par n="громад/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="діалог"><i>діало</i><par n="діало/г__n_m_nn"/></e>
<e lm="дільниця"><i>дільниц</i><par n="дільниц/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="енергетик"><i>енергетик</i><par n="енергетик__n_m_aa"/></e>
